Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.110

Commercial advertiser. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Commercial advertiser" means any person that sells the service of communicating messages or producing material for broadcast or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public whether through brochures, fliers, newspapers, magazines, television, radio, billboards, direct mail advertising, printing, paid internet or digital communications, or any other means of mass communication used for the purpose of appealing, directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support in any election campaign.

[ 2024 c 164 s 211.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.